Tennessee, session 114, HB1335.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 58-2-106(b), is amended by adding
the following new subdivision:
( ) Annually submit by February 1 of each year, a report to the governor, the
speaker of the senate, and the speaker of the house of representatives detailing
recovery efforts engaged in by the agency during the prior calendar year and
recommendations on how to improve the efficiency of future recovery efforts;
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1335
002894
- 1 -